Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-62] Declaration of water shortage.
(a) The commission shall formulate a plan for implementation during periods of
water shortage. As a part of the plan, the commission shall adopt a reasonable
system of permit classification according to source of water supply, method of
extraction or diversion, use of water, or a combination thereof.

(b) The commission, by rule, may declare that
a water shortage exists within all or part of an area when insufficient water
is available to meet the requirements of the permit system or when conditions
are such as to require a temporary reduction in total water use within the area
to protect water resources from serious harm. The commission shall publish a
set of criteria for determining when a water shortage exists.

(c) In accordance with the plan adopted under
subsection (a), the commission may impose such restrictions on one or more
classes of permits as may be necessary to protect the water resources of the
area from serious harm and to restore them to their previous condition.

(d) A declaration of water shortage and any
measures adopted pursuant thereto may be rescinded by rule by the commission.

(e) When a water shortage is declared, the
commission shall cause a notice thereof to be published in a prominent place in
a newspaper of general circulation throughout the area. The notice shall be
published each day for the first week of the shortage and once a week
thereafter until the declaration is rescinded. Publication of such notice
shall serve as notice to all water users in the area of the condition of water
shortage.

(f) The commission shall cause each permittee
in the area to be notified by regular mail of any change in the conditions of
the permittee's permit, any suspension thereof, or of any other restriction on
the use of water for the duration of the water shortage.

(g) If an emergency condition arises due to a
water shortage within any area, whether within or outside of a water management
area, and if the commission finds that the restrictions imposed under
subsection (c) are not sufficient to protect the public health, safety, or
welfare, or the health of animals, fish, or aquatic life, or a public water
supply, or recreational, municipal, agricultural, or other reasonable uses, the
commission may issue orders reciting the existence of such an emergency and
requiring that such actions as the commission deems necessary to meet the
emergency be taken, including but not limited to apportioning, rotating,
limiting, or prohibiting the use of the water resources of the area. Any party
to whom an emergency order is directed may challenge such an order but shall
immediately comply with the order, pending disposition of the party's
challenge. The commission shall give precedence to a hearing on such challenge
over all other pending matters. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next